Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.192

Cities and towns—Ordinance enacting certain sections of chapter—Limitations—Penalties.

Every city or town is authorized to enact as an ordinance of that city or town any or all of the sections of this chapter the violation of which constitutes a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor. The city or town may not modify the language of any section of this chapter in enacting such section except as necessary to put the section in the proper form of an ordinance or to provide for a sentence [to] be served in the appropriate detention facility. The ordinance must provide for the same maximum penalty for its violation as may be imposed under the section in this chapter.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 11.]